es: Variedad de licor: Licor de bayas; Licor de chocolate; Licor de café; Licor de crema; Licor floral; Licor de frutas; Licor de hierbas; Licor de frutos secos; Licor de arroz; Otros
ko: 리큐어 종류: 베리 리큐어; 초콜릿 리큐어; 커피 리큐어; 크림 리큐어; 꽃 리큐어; 과일 리큐어; 허브 리큐어; 견과류 리큐어; 쌀 리큐어; 기타
th: ลักษณะเหล้า: เหล้าเบอร์รี่; เหล้าช็อกโกแลต; เหล้ากาแฟ; เหล้าครีม; เหล้าดอกไม้; เหล้าผลไม้; เหล้าสมุนไพร; เหล้าถั่ว; เหล้าข้าว; อื่นๆ
sv: Likörsort: Bärlikör; Chokladlikör; Kaffelikör; Gräddlikör; Blommig likör; Fruktlikör; Örtlikör; Nötlikör; Rislikör; Övrigt
nb: Likørvariant: Bærlikør; Sjokoladelikør; Kaffelikør; Kremlikør; Blomsterlikør; Fruktlikør; Urtelikør; Nøttelikør; Rislikør; Annet
pl: Odmiana likieru: Likier jagodowy; Likier czekoladowy; Likier kawowy; Likier śmietankowy; Likier kwiatowy; Likier owocowy; Likier ziołowy; Likier orzechowy; Likier ryżowy; Inne
hu: Likőrfajták: Bogyósgyümölcs-likőr; Csokoládélikőr; Kávélikőr; Krémlikőr; Viráglikőr; Gyümölcslikőr; Gyógynövénylikőr; Diólikőr; Rizslikőr; Egyéb
bg-BG: Сорт ликьор: Ягодов ликьор; Шоколадов ликьор; Ликьор от кафе; Крем ликьор; Флорален ликьор; Плодов ликьор; Билков ликьор; Ликьор от ядки; Оризов ликьор; Други
sl-SI: Raznolikost likerja: Liker iz jagodičevja; Čokoladni liker; Kavni liker; Kremni liker; Cvetlični liker; Sadni liker; Zeliščni liker; Oreškast liker; Rižev liker; Drugo
en: Liqueur variety: Berry liqueur; Chocolate liqueur; Coffee liqueur; Cream liqueur; Floral liqueur; Fruit liqueur; Herbal liqueur; Nut liqueur; Rice liqueur; Other
tr: Likör Çeşitleri: Orman meyveleri likörü; Çikolata likörü; Kahve likörü; Krema likörü; Çiçek likörü; Meyve likörü; Bitkisel likör; Fındık likörü; Pirinç likörü; Diğer
pt-PT: Variedade de licores: Licor de frutos vermelhas; Licor de chocolate; Licor de café; Licor de natas; Licor floral; Licor de fruta; Licor herbal; Licor de frutos secos; Licor de arroz; Outro
pt-BR: Variedade de licor: Licor de frutas vermelhas; Licor de chocolate; Licor de café; Licor de creme; Licor floral; Licor de frutas; Licor de ervas; Licor de nozes; Licor de arroz; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta likera: Liker od bobičastog voća; Čokoladni liker; Liker od kave; Kremasti liker; Cvjetni liker; Voćni liker; Biljni liker; Liker od orašastih plodova; Liker od riže; Ostalo
ru: Разновидность ликера: Ягодный ликер; Шоколадный ликер; Кофейный ликер; Сливочный ликер; Цветочный ликер; Фруктовый ликер; Травяной ликер; Ореховый ликер; Рисовый ликер; Другое
fi: Liköörivalikoima: Marjalikööri; Suklaalikööri; Kahvilikööri; Kermalikööri; Kukkalikööri; Hedelmälikööri; Yrttilikööri; Pähkinälikööri; Riisilikööri; Muu
sk-SK: Odroda likéru: Bobuľový likér; Čokoládový likér; Kávový likér; Smotanový likér; Kvetinový likér; Ovocný likér; Bylinný likér; Orieškový likér; Ryžový likér; Iné
zh-TW: 利口酒種類: 莓果利口酒; 巧克力利口酒; 咖啡利口酒; 奶油利口酒; 花香利口酒; 水果利口酒; 草本利口酒; 堅果利口酒; 米利口酒; 其他
de: Auswahl an Likören: Beerenlikör; Schokoladenlikör; Kaffeelikör; Sahnelikör; Blumenlikör; Fruchtlikör; Kräuterlikör; Nusslikör; Reislikör; Sonstiges
da: Likørvariant: Bærlikør; Chokoladelikør; Kaffelikør; Flødelikør; Blomsterlikør; Frugtlikør; Urtelikør; Nøddelikør; Rislikør; Andet
vi: Loại rượu mùi: Rượu mùi quả mọng; Rượu mùi sô cô la; Rượu mùi cà phê; Rượu mùi kem; Rượu mùi hoa; Rượu mùi trái cây; Rượu mùi thảo mộc; Rượu mùi hạt; Rượu mùi gạo; Khác
el: Ποικιλία λικέρ: Λικέρ μούρων; Λικέρ σοκολάτας; Λικέρ καφέ; Λικέρ κρέμας; Λικέρ ανθέων; Λικέρ φρούτων; Λικέρ βοτάνων; Λικέρ ξηρών καρπών; Λικέρ ρυζιού; Άλλο
fr: Variété de liqueur: Liqueur de baies; Liqueur de chocolat; Liqueur de café; Liqueur de crème; Liqueur florale; Liqueur de fruits; Liqueur aux herbes; Liqueur de noix; Liqueur de riz; Autre
cs: Druh likéru: Berry likér; Čokoládový likér; Kávový likér; Smetanový likér; Květinový likér; Ovocný likér; Bylinný likér; Ořechový likér; Ořechový likér; Jiné
zh-CN: 利口酒品种: 浆果利口酒; 巧克力利口酒; 咖啡利口酒; 奶油利口酒; 花香利口酒; 水果利口酒; 草本利口酒; 坚果利口酒; 米酒利口酒; 其他
nl: Likeurvariant: Bessenlikeur; Chocoladelikeur; Koffielikeur; Roomlikeur; Bloemenlikeur; Vruchtenlikeur; Kruidenlikeur; Notenlikeur; Rijstlikeur; Andere
ro-RO: Sortimente de lichior: Lichior de fructe de padure; Lichior de ciocolată; Lichior de cafea; Lichior cremă; Lichior floral; Lichior de fructe; Lichior de plante; Lichior de nuci; Lichior de orez; Altele
it: Varietà di liquore: Liquore di bacche; Liquore al cioccolato; Liquore al caffè; Liquore alla panna; Liquore floreale; Liquore alla frutta; Liquore alle erbe; Liquore alla frutta secca; Liquore di riso; Altro
ja: リキュール各種: ベリーリキュール; チョコレートリキュール; コーヒーリキュール; クリームリキュール; フローラルリキュール; フルーツリキュール; ハーブリキュール; ナッツリキュール; ライスリキュール; その他
lt-LT: Likerio rūšis: Uogų likeris; Šokoladinis likeris; Kavos likeris; Kreminis likeris; Gėlių likeris; Vaisių likeris; Vaistažolių likeris; Riešutų likeris; Ryžių likeris; Kita